Arkansas statutes. Title 21 Public Officers and Employees
Chapter 5 Compensation and Benefits
21-5-1402. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Class” or “classification” means a group of positions sufficiently similar as to duties performed, scope of discretion and responsibility, minimum requirements of education or training, skill, experience, and other characteristics that the same class title, the same test of fitness, and the same grade have been or may be applied to each position in the group;

“Classified employee” means a person regularly appointed or employed in a position of state service by an institution of higher education for which:

He or she is compensated on a full-time basis or on a pro rata basis; and

A class title and grade are established in the appropriation act for the institution in accordance with the classification and compensation plan enacted in this subchapter;

“Class specification” means a written document that identifies a group of positions that require the same type of work and responsibility and sets out the general components of the job description for each position in the category by providing a class title, class code, distinguishing features and examples of work, knowledge, skills, and abilities, and the necessary minimum education and experience requirements to perform the assigned duties;

“Crossgrade” means a temporary reclassification of a position during the fiscal year.

The Division of Higher Education may authorize a temporary crossgrade through a change in the classification of a position from the classification authorized in an institution's appropriation act between legislative sessions to assure correct classification and for other purposes with the following restrictions:

A position shall not be crossgraded to a classification at a grade higher than the grade originally authorized for the position by the General Assembly in the institution's appropriation act;

A position may be crossgraded to a classification at the same or lower grade than the position as originally authorized for the position by the General Assembly in the institution's appropriation act;

Positions that have been crossgraded may be restored to the original authorized class during the fiscal year with the approval of the division for those positions within the same occupational group;

Position classifications may be crossgraded or restored to their original classifications only after the review and approval of the division;

Positions established under the pay plan may not be crossgraded to positions having an authorized line item maximum salary established by the General Assembly in the institution of higher education's appropriation act; and

Positions having an authorized line item maximum salary by the General Assembly in the institution's appropriation act may not be crossgraded from line-item status to classified status;

“Demotion” means the change in duty assignment of an employee from a position in one classification to a position in another classification of a lower grade;

“Grade” means an authorized pay range for classifications assigned to the pay plan having a minimum pay level, midpoint pay level, and maximum pay level as provided in this subchapter;

“Head of the institution” means the executive head of an institution of higher education;

“Institution of higher education” or “institution” means a public institution of higher education supported, in whole or in part, by appropriation of state funds;

“Job sharing” means a form of employment in which the hours of work of two (2) or more persons are arranged in such a way as to cover one (1) regular full-time position.

The division may authorize job sharing for any regular full-time position.

The Director of the Division of Higher Education or his or her designee shall promulgate necessary rules to carry out this subdivision (9);

“Maximum pay level” means the highest authorized level of pay for a grade for normal compensation administration purposes;

“Midpoint pay level” means the rate of pay midway between the minimum pay level and the maximum pay level established for each grade;

“Minimum pay level” means the entry level pay rate for classifications assigned to the compensation plan;

“Occupational group” means a collection of classes having similar job description components and sharing a primary function.

In determining the occupational group to which a class is assigned, consideration shall be given to the type of work performed, the education or experience required, job elements or tasks, and the purpose of the job;

“Pay level” means any single rate of pay in a grade, including the minimum pay level, midpoint pay level, and maximum pay level;

“Position” means an office or employment that is legislatively authorized in an institution of higher education, occupied or vacant, requiring the services of one (1) full-time equivalent employee;

“Promotion” means the change in duty assignment of an employee from a position in one classification to a position in another classification of a higher grade; and

“Reclassification” means a change in the assignment of a position from one classification title to another classification title of either a higher or lower grade when material and permanent changes in the duties and responsibilities of the position being recommended for reclassification have occurred or when it is necessary to establish a new classification title to meet federal standards as a prerequisite for federal programs.

Positions eligible for reclassification within an institution of higher education are only those positions assigned a specific classification title and grade.

Positions having a line-item maximum salary are exempt from the provisions in this section and may not be reclassified from line-item status to a classified designation bearing a salary grade.

Positions within an institution of higher education designated within a classification title and grade shall not be reclassified to a classification title for which a line-item maximum annual salary has been established.

Interim reclassifications approved by the division shall be implemented through the crossgrading of existing positions within an institution of higher education or through the acquisition of pool positions as authorized in § 21-5-1415(a)(1).

Amendments. The 2019 amendment by No. 763 deleted former (1) through (3) and (9), inserted (12), and redesignated the remaining definitions accordingly; substituted “pay plan” for “career service compensation plan” in (4)(B)(v); rewrote (6); substituted “minimum” for “base” in (11); substituted “minimum pay level, midpoint pay level, and maximum pay level” for “entrance rate, intermediate rate, and the maximum rate of pay” in (14); and substituted “21-5-1415(a)(1)” for “21-5-1414(a)(1)” in (17)(E).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Higher Education” for “Department of Higher Education” in the introductory language of (7)(B) [now (4)(B)] and in (13)(B) [now (9)(B)]; and substituted “division” for “department” in (7) [now (4)] twice and in (13) and (20) [now (9) and (17)].

History.

Acts 2017, No. 599, §
4; 2019, No. 763, § 1; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2313-2317.

21-5-1403. Regular salary procedures and restrictions.

Arkansas Constitution, Article 16, § 4, provides: “The General Assembly shall fix the salaries and fees of all officers in the State, and no greater salary or fee than that fixed by law shall be paid to any officer, employee or other person, or at any rate other than par value; and the number and salaries of the clerks and employees of the different departments of the State shall be fixed by law.” Therefore, the following provisions are applicable to all authorized regular salary positions in appropriation acts unless specific exception is made otherwise by law:

For any position authorized by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas for the benefit of any institution of higher education for which the provisions of this subchapter are to be applicable, it is the intent of the General Assembly that this subchapter govern with respect to:

The entry pay level;

The frequency with which increases in pay may be granted; and

The maximum annual salary that may be paid for the grade assigned each employee;

For any position authorized by the General Assembly for the benefit of any institution of higher education for which a maximum annual salary is set out in dollars, it is the intent of the General Assembly that the position be paid at a rate of pay not to exceed the maximum established for the position during any one (1) fiscal year and that the maximum annual salary authorized is for full-time employment;

For all positions authorized by the General Assembly for any institution of higher education, it is the intent of the General Assembly in determining the annual salaries of employees in those positions, that the head of the institution take into consideration the ability of the employee and length of service.

It is not the intent of the General Assembly that the maximum annual salaries as authorized in the appropriation act or pay increases established for the various grades under this subchapter be paid unless the employee meets the qualifications associated with each pay level and then only within the limitations of the appropriations and funds available for that purpose.

An employee authorized by the General Assembly shall not receive from appropriated or cash funds, either from state, federal, or other sources, compensation in an amount greater than that established by the General Assembly as the maximum annual salary for the employee, unless specific provisions are made by law; and

An employee of an institution of higher education shall not be paid any additional cash allowances, including without limitation uniform allowance, clothing allowance, motor vehicle depreciation or replacement allowance, fixed transportation allowance, or meals and lodging allowance other than for reimbursement for costs actually incurred by the employee unless the allowances are specifically set out by law as to eligibility of employees to receive the allowances, and the maximum amount of such allowances are established by law for each employee or for each class of employees eligible to receive the allowances.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 599, §
4.